Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5669
Loan repayment program; office; duties.

The office shall develop guidelines for community participation in the loan repayment program. The office shall provide consultation to potential community participants and facilitate the matching of communities and health professionals.

Laws 1991, LB 400, § 20;

Laws 1994, LB 1223, § 65;

Laws 1996, LB 1155, § 57.